Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3723.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 121A.425, is amended to read: 121A.425 FULL AND EQUITABLE PARTICIPATION IN EARLY LEARNING. Subdivision 1. Disciplinary dismissals deleted text begin prohibiteddeleted text end . (a) A pupil enrolled in the following deleted text begin is not subject to dismissals under this chapterdeleted text end new text begin early learning programs may be dismissed in accordance with this sectionnew text end : (1) a preschool or prekindergarten program, including an early childhood family education, school readiness, school readiness plus, voluntary prekindergarten, Head Start, or other school-based preschool or prekindergarten program; or (2) kindergarten through grade 3. (b) This provision does not apply to a dismissal from school for less than one school day, except as provided under chapter 125A and federal law for a student receiving special education services. deleted text begin (c) Notwithstanding this subdivision, expulsions and exclusions may be used only after resources outlined in subdivision 2 have been exhausted, and only in circumstances where there is an ongoing serious safety threat to the child or others. deleted text end Subd. 2. Nonexclusionary discipline. For purposes of this section, nonexclusionary discipline must include at least one of the following: (1) collaborating with the pupil's family or guardian, child mental health consultant or provider, education specialist, or other community-based support; (2) creating a plan, written with the parent or guardian, that details the action and support needed for the pupil to fully participate in the current educational program, including a preschool or prekindergarten program; or (3) providing a referral for needed support services, including parenting education, home visits, other supportive education interventions, or, where appropriate, an evaluation to determine if the pupil is eligible for special education services or section 504 services. new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Suspension. new text end new text begin A pupil in an early learning program under subdivision 1 may be suspended only if there is an ongoing serious safety threat to the child or others and after nonexclusionary discipline under subdivision 2 has been exhausted. The procedural requirements under section 121A.46 apply to a suspension under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Exclusion and expulsion. new text end new text begin A pupil in an early learning program under subdivision 1 may be expelled or excluded only if there is an ongoing serious safety threat to the child or others and after nonexclusionary discipline under subdivision 2 has been exhausted. The procedural requirements under section 121A.47 apply to an exclusion or expulsion under this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for the 2026-2027 school year and later. new text end